test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-umaal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - umāl: # Noun 233 'eng /est humal/fin' - full paradigm
     umāl+N+Sg+Nom: umāl
     umāl+N+Sg+Gen: umāl
     umāl+N+Sg+Par: umālt
     umāl+N+Sg+Dat: umālõn
     umāl+N+Sg+Ins: umālõks
     umāl+N+Sg+Ill: umālõ
     umāl+N+Sg+Ela: umālõst
     umāl+N+Pl+Nom: umāld
     umāl+N+Pl+Gen: umāld
     umāl+N+Pl+Par: umāļi
     umāl+N+Pl+Dat: umāldõn
     umāl+N+Pl+Ins: umāldõks
     umāl+N+Pl+Ill: umāļiž
     umāl+N+Pl+Ela: umāļist
